Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-2723, as
amended by Section 5, Chapter 407, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-2723), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-2723. A. The Health Care Workforce Training
Commission shall have the option of utilizing utilize available
funding in excess of the amount necessary to fund the Oklahoma
Medical Loan Repayment Program described in Section 1-2721 of this
title to fund new or expanded primary care residency programs in
rural and underserved areas of the state. Such new or expanded
primary care residency program funding shall include but not be
limited to:
Req. No. 15742 Page 1

1. Payments to hospitals or teaching health centers desiring to
establish new primary care residency programs. Such payments shall
be made to cover the costs of salaries, benefits and educational
costs of residents in training at the facility; or
2. Payments to hospitals or teaching health centers with
existing primary residency programs desiring to expand the number of
residents participating in those programs. Such payments shall be
made to cover the costs of salaries, benefits and educational costs
of residents in training at the facility.
B. Provisions of this section shall be subject to the
promulgated rules of the Commission.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15742 TJ 01/04/26










Req. No. 15742 Page 2